incubator/apertium-asm/apertium-asm.asm.dix
    <pardef n="অপেশ্বৰী_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>য়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইগৰাকীয়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গৰাকীয়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>সকল</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="names_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৱে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ক</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="months_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="places_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লৈ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="অদ্ভূত_adj">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="যদি_ot">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="ot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="তুমি_prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <!-- Fixed:-->

    <pardef n="লিথ__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>া</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>োতে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="gna1"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni1"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলত</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িবা</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িবি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>া</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলা</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছিলা</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছা</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িছে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
<pardef n="খ/া_vblex">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ও</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="আছ__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>া</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni1"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni1"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>া</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলা</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলে</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <!-- Broken below -->

    <e lm="অঞ্জনা"><i>অঞ্জনা</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="শ্বাহজাহান"><i>শ্বাহজাহান</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="অনামিকা"><i>অনামিকা</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="অৰ্জুন"><i>অৰ্জুন</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="ইন্দ্ৰ"><i>ইন্দ্ৰ</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="মমতাজ মহল"><i>মমতাজ<b/>মহল</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="জেট এয়াৰওৱেজ"><i>জেট<b/>এয়াৰওৱেজ</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="জলপক্ষী অভয়াৰণ্য"><i>জলপক্ষী<b/>অভয়াৰণ্য</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="শাসক সকলে"><i>শাসক<b/>সকলে</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
    <e lm="আগষ্ট"><i>আগষ্ট</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="আঘোন"><i>আঘোন</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="এপ্ৰিল"><i>এপ্ৰিল</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="জুন"><i>জুন</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="জানুৱাৰী"><i>জানুৱাৰী</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="ফেব্ৰুৱাৰী"><i>ফেব্ৰুৱাৰী</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="মে'"><i>মে'</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="চেপ্তেম্বৰ"><i>চেপ্তেম্বৰ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="দিচেম্বৰ"><i>দিচেম্বৰ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
    <e lm="আমেৰিকা"><i>আমেৰিকা</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাৰত"><i>ভাৰত</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="লুইত"><i>লুইত</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="উদয়পুৰ"><i>উদয়পুৰ</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্ৰাজিল"><i>ব্ৰাজিল</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="কানাদা"><i>কানাদা</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="দিল্লী"><i>দিল্লী</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="কেওলাদেও ঘন ৰাষ্ট্ৰীয় উদ্যান"><i>কেওলাদেও<b/>ঘন<b/>ৰাষ্ট্ৰীয়<b/>উদ্যান</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
    <e lm="তিৰোতা"><i>তিৰোতা</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
    <e lm="মাইকী মানুহ"><i>মাইকী<b/>মানুহ</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
    <e lm="খুৰী"><i>খুৰী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
    <e lm="মাহী"><i>মাহী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
    <e lm="অৱশেষত"><i>অৱশেষত</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="এই ধৰণৰ"><i>এই<b/>ধৰণৰ</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বোবা"><i>বোবা</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কম"><i>কম</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাহিৰত"><i>বাহিৰত</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অৱস্থিত"><i>অৱস্থিত</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="এই কাৰণে"><i>এই<b/>কাৰণে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="কাৰণ"><i>কাৰণ</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="কৃপা কৰি"><i>কৃপা<b/>কৰি</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="কোনোবা"><i>কোনোবা</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="যি ঠাইত"><i>যি<b/>ঠাইত</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="লৈকে"><i>লৈকে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="প্ৰথমে"><i>প্ৰথমে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="এই ঠাইতে"><i>এই<b/>ঠাইতে</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="হেতু"><i>হেতু</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="তেনেকৈ"><i>তেনেকৈ</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="শ্ৰীমতী"><i>শ্ৰীমতী</i><par n="যদি_ot"/></e>
    <e lm="খা"><i>খা</i><par n="খ/া_vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="আছ"><i>আছ</i><par n="আছ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="কাট"><i>কাট</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="খুৱা"><i>খুৱা</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘট"><i>ঘট</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ব'ল"><i>ব'ল</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="লুকা"><i>লুকা</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="জিয়া"><i>জিয়া</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ঠেল"><i>ঠেল</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="হেঁচা খা"><i>হেঁচা<b/>খা</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ধৰ"><i>ধৰ</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="বনা"><i>বনা</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="হাঁহ"><i>হাঁহ</i><par n="লিথ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="তোমাক"><i>তোমাক</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="তই"><i>তই</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="মই"><i>মই</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="মোৰ"><i>মোৰ</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="এইটো"><i>এইটো</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="এইটোও"><i>এইটোও</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="সি"><i>সি</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="তেখেত"><i>তেখেত</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="তেখেতসকল"><i>তেখেতসকল</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="তেওঁৱেই"><i>তেওঁৱেই</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
    <e lm="আমাক"><i>আমাক</i><par n="তুমি_prn"/></e>
   <e lm="ক্ষেত্"><i>ক্ষেত্</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
      <e lm="ভবন"><i>ভবন</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
  	<e lm="দেউতা"><i>দেউতা</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
 	   <e lm="শেষ"><i>শেষ</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
	 <e lm="ছোৱালী"><i>ছোৱালী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
<e lm="সহস্রাব্দ"><i>সহস্রাব্দ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
<e lm="মিনাৰ"><i>মিনাৰ</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
<e lm="মা"><i>মা</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
<e lm="নিউমোনিয়া"><i>নিউমোনিয়া</i><par n="names_n"/></e>
<e lm="ৰানী"><i>ৰানী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
<e lm="ভন্টী"><i>ভন্টী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
<e lm="কুমাৰী"><i>কুমাৰী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
<e lm="স্ত্রী"><i>স্ত্রী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
	<e lm="চিড়িয়াখানা"><i>চিড়িয়াখানা</i><par n="places_n"/></e>
	<e lm="অক্টোবৰ"><i>অক্টোবৰ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
	<e lm="ছাত্রী"><i>ছাত্রী</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
	<e lm="মহিলা"><i>মহিলা</i><par n="অপেশ্বৰী_n"/></e>
	<e lm="ডিচেম্বৰ"><i>ডিচেম্বৰ</i><par n="months_n"/></e>
   <e lm="ধাৰাবাহিক"><i>ধাৰাবাহিক</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
   <e lm="কম"><i>কম</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
   <e lm="তাৎক্ষণিক"><i>তাৎক্ষণিক</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
   <e lm="ঘূণীয়া"><i>ঘূণীয়া</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
   <e lm="আইনি"><i>আইনি</i><par n="অদ্ভূত_adj"/></e>
